Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1187.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 1308.3, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1308.3. Any active employee eligible to participate or
who is a participant may opt out of the state's basic plan as
outlined in Sections 1370 and 1371 of this title, or may opt out of
the health and dental basic plan options only, and retain the life
and disability plan benefits, provided that the participant is
currently covered by a separate group health insurance plan or will
be covered by a separate group health insurance plan at or before
the beginning of the next plan year. Any active employee eligible
to participate or who is a participant opting out of coverage
pursuant to this section shall provide proof of the separate health
insurance plan participation and sign an affidavit attesting that
the participant is currently covered and does not require state-
provided health insurance each plan year. Any active employee
opting out of the state's basic plan or the health and dental basic
plan options pursuant to this section shall receive One Hundred
Fifty Dollars ($150.00) in lieu of the flexible benefit amount the

employee would be otherwise eligible to receive. Any savings
realized by the state as a result of a participant opting out of
health insurance plan coverage shall be retained by the state.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1187 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 25th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 28th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1187 Page 3